Florida, session 2026, SB188.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 38 39 Section 1.âSubsection (3) is added to section 406.11, 40 Florida Statutes, to read: 41 406.11âExaminations, investigations, and autopsies.â 42 (3)(a)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 43 1.ââSudden Arrhythmic Death Syndrome(SADS)â means the 44 sudden and unexpected death due to cardiac arrhythmia, as 45 determined by performance of an autopsy or a clinical 46 investigation, of a young, apparently healthy individual with no 47 previously diagnosed structural heart disease. 48 2.ââSudden Death in the Young (SDY)â means the sudden and 49 unexpected death of an individual younger than 20 years of age 50 due to natural causes, including, but not limited to, sudden 51 cardiac death or sudden unexpected death in epilepsy, which 52 death remains unexplained after initial investigation. 53 3.ââSudden Infant Death Syndrome (SIDS)â means the sudden 54 death of an infant younger than 1 year of age which remains 55 unexplained after a thorough case investigation, including 56 performance of an autopsy, scene investigations, and a review of 57 clinical history. 58 4.ââSudden Unexpected Infant Death (SUID)â means the sudden 59 and unexpected death of an infant younger than 1 year of age, 60 whether explained or unexplained, including, but not limited to, 61 death caused by SIDS, accidental suffocation, and other 62 potential causes. 63 5.ââSudden Unexpected Infant Death (SUID) and Sudden Death 64 in the Young (SDY) Case Registryâ means the national 65 surveillance system coordinated by the Centers for Disease 66 Control and Prevention and the National Institutes of Health 67 which collects standardized data on sudden and unexpected deaths 68 in individuals younger than 20 years of age. 69 (b)âIn the case of an infant or child who dies suddenly and 70 unexpectedly, including cases of SIDS, SUID, or SDY, the autopsy 71 must include microscopic and toxicology studies and a review of 72 the childâs immunization and medical records, as available 73 through the stateâs immunization registry established pursuant 74 to s. 381.003, from the childâs pediatrician or primary care 75 practitioner, or from other sources. The medical examiner shall 76 document in the autopsy report any immunizations or emergency 77 countermeasures administered to the child within 90 days before 78 the childâs death and report the case to the SUID and SDY Case 79 Registry in accordance with protocols established by the 80 Department of Health and the Centers for Disease Control and 81 Prevention. 82 (c)âIn the case of a sudden death suspected to be caused by 83 SADS in an individual of any age, the autopsy must include 84 microscopic and toxicology studies and a review of the 85 individualâs immunization and medical records, as available 86 through state health databases or other sources. The medical 87 examiner shall document in the autopsy report any immunizations 88 or emergency countermeasures administered to the individual 89 within 90 days before his or her death and report the case to 90 the SUID and SDY Case Registry if the individual was younger 91 than 20 years of age at the time of death, in accordance with 92 protocols established by the Department of Health and the 93 Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. 94 (d)âThe Department of Health shall impose the following 95 administrative penalties against a district medical examiner who 96 fails to report a case of SIDS, SUID, SDY, or SADS, for 97 individuals younger than 20 years of age, to the SUID and SDY 98 Case Registry within 30 days after completing the autopsy 99 report: 100 1.âFor the first unreported case, a fine of up to $1,000. 101 2.âFor the second unreported case, a fine of up to $5,000. 102 3.âFor repeated noncompliance, referral to the Medical 103 Examiners Commission for disciplinary action, which may include 104 suspension or removal pursuant to s. 406.075. 105 (e)âCompliance with the reporting and documentation 106 requirements of this section is deemed a permissible disclosure 107 under state and federal medical privacy laws, including the 108 Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996. 109 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.